sv: Lämplig för matberedartyp: Matberedare; Matkvarn; Matmixer; Övrigt
nl: Geschikt voor type keukenmachine: Blender (voedsel); Molen (voedsel); Mixer (voedsel); Andere
nb: Egnet for kjøkkenmaskintype: Matblendere; Matkverner; Matmiksere; Annet
vi: Thích hợp cho loại máy chế biến thực phẩm: Máy xay thực phẩm; Máy xay hạt; Máy trộn thực phẩm; Khác
hu: Konyhai robotgép típusa: Ételturmix; Ételdarálók; Ételmixerek; Egyéb
el: Κατάλληλο για τύπο επεξεργαστή τροφίμων: Μπλέντερ τροφίμων; Μύλοι τροφίμων; Μίξερ τροφίμων; Άλλο
pt-BR: Adequado para tipo de processador de alimentos: Liquidificador para alimentos; Triturador de alimentos; Mixer de alimentos; Outro
en: Suitable for food processor type: Food blender; Food grinder; Food mixer; Other
sl-SI: Primerno za tip kuhinjskega robota: Mešalnik hrane; Mlinček za hrano; Mešalniki za hrano; Drugo
pl: Typ odpowiedni dla robota kuchennego: Blender kuchenny; Młynek do żywności; Mikser kuchenny; Inne
pt-PT: Adequado para o tipo de processador de alimentos: Liquidificadora; Picadora; Misturadora; Outro
ro-RO: Potrivit pentru tipul robot de bucătărie: Blender pentru alimente; Mașină de tocat alimente; Mixer pentru alimente; Altele
da: Velegnet til foodprocessortype: Madblender; Madkværn; Madmixer; Andet
lt-LT: Tinka virtuvės kombaino tipui: Maisto trintuvas; Maisto grūstuvė; Maisto maišytuvas; Kita
fi: Soveltuu yleiskoneen tyypille: Tehosekoitin; Ruokamylly; Keittiön yleiskone; Muu
sk-SK: Vhodné pre typ kuchynského robota: Potravinový mixér; Mlynček na potraviny; Mixér na potraviny; Iné
ko: 푸드 프로세서 유형에 적합: 식품 블렌더; 식품 분쇄기; 식품 믹서; 기타
hr-HR: Vrsta prerađivača hrane za koji je prikladno: Blender za hranu; Mlinac za hranu; Mikser za hranu; Ostalo
zh-TW: 適合食品加工機類型: 果汁機; 食品研磨機; 食品攪拌機; 其他
bg-BG: Подходящ за тип кухненски робот: Пасатор за храна; Мелница за храна; Миксер за храна; Други
fr: Convient au type de robot culinaire: Mélangeur alimentaire; Broyeur de nourriture; Mixeur alimentaire; Autre
th: เหมาะสำหรับประเภทเครื่องเตรียมอาหาร: เครื่องปั่นอาหาร; เครื่องบดอาหาร; เครื่องผสมอาหาร; อื่นๆ
ru: Для какого типа прибора для обработки продуктов: Кухонный блендер; Кухонный измельчитель; Кухонный миксер; Другое
ja: フードプロセッサーの種類に適している: フードブレンダー; フードグラインダー; フードミキサー; その他
tr: Mutfak robotu türüne uygun: Blender; Öğütücü; Yiyecek karıştırıcı; Diğer
cs: Vhodný typ kuchyňského robota: Blendr; Mlýnek; Mixér; Jiné
zh-CN: 适用的食品加工机类型: 食品搅拌器; 食品研磨机; 食品混合器; 其他
es: Adecuado para de tipo procesador de alimentos: Licuadoras de alimentos; Trituradoras de alimentos; Mezcladoras de alimentos; Otros
de: Geeignet für Küchenmaschinen des Typs: Pürierstab; Fleischwolf; Mixer; Sonstiges
it: Tipo di robot da cucina ideale: Frullatori alimentari; Tritatutto per alimenti; Mixer alimentari; Altro